Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3635
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the Nebraska Corn Resources Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 35;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 18.